Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-8,109
Teacher, administrator, or full-time employee; personnel file; access; written response; attach.

Any teacher, administrator, or full-time employee of any public school district shall, upon his or her request, have access to his or her personnel file maintained by the district and shall have the right to attach a written response to any item in such file. Such teacher, administrator, or employee may in writing authorize any other person to have access to such file, which authorization shall be honored by the district. Such access and right to attach a written response shall not be granted with respect to any letters of recommendation solicited by the employer which appear in the personnel file. No other person except school officials while engaged in their professional duties shall be granted access to such file, and the contents thereof shall not be divulged in any manner to any unauthorized person.

Laws 1973, LB 370, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,156;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 534.